Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.24
Nebraska educational television network; exempt from sections; when.

Sections 23-1715, 81-1108.02, 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.03, 81-1120.15 to 81-1120.28, and 81-1423 shall not apply to the Nebraska educational television network except for such services or assistance as may be mutually beneficial and agreed upon by and between the division of communications and the Nebraska Educational Television Commission. Under conditions of emergency declared by the Governor, the communications resources of the Nebraska educational television network shall be coordinated with the communications system, as directed by the Governor, so as to provide full use of available services in the rendering of public assistance and providing aid and protection to life and property.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 10, p. 1884;

Laws 1971, LB 675, § 7;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.10;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 15.